District of Columbia statutes.
38-2561.08

Certificate of Approval — Compliance.

(a)

All nonpublic special education schools or programs serving students with disabilities with funding provided by the District of Columbia government shall come into full compliance with this chapter by August 15, 2007, for the 2007-2008 academic school year.

(b)

To continue receiving funding from the District of Columbia government in the 2007-2008 academic school year, all nonpublic special education schools or programs shall submit an initial application for a Certificate of Approval to the SEA no later than 90 days after March 14, 2007.

(c)

For the 2008-2009 academic school year and each subsequent school year, a nonpublic special education school or program seeking a Certificate of Approval shall submit an initial application to the SEA no later than 45 days prior to the start of the school year.

(d)

Not later than 45 days prior to the start of each school year, a school or program granted a Certificate of Approval by the SEA shall certify its annual compliance with this chapter, and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter, by filing a certificate of compliance with the SEA.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-269, § 108, 54 DCR 841
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 108 of Placement of Students with Disabilities in Nonpublic Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-667, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1134).